Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 2 Hospitals, Health Care Facilities and
Health Services

Cross references. —

As to the use of automated external defibrillators, see §

35-26-101

et seq.

As to licensing of clinical laboratories and blood banks, see §§

33-34-101

to

33-34-109

.

As to ambulance business licenses, see §§

33-36-101

to

33-36-113

.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 103, § 1, provides:

“(a)

The Wyoming health care commission with the assistance of the department shall conduct a study of unreimbursed catastrophic costs incurred by Wyoming hospitals. The study shall:

“(i)

Identify the magnitude of the problem;

“(ii)

Determine the level of costs shifted to private pay and private insurance customers;

“(iii)

Determine if access to services, especially trauma services, is endangered for both paying patients and patients unable to pay due to poverty;

“(iv)

Determine if reimbursement problems are endangering implementation of an effective trauma care system in Wyoming;

“(v)

Determine if state, county or local hospital district financial support for reimbursement problems identified by the report will provide long term solutions to the reimbursement problems;

“(vi)

Consider reasonable alternatives for reimbursing hospitals and other health care providers for unreimbursed catastrophic care and unreimbursed trauma care;

“(vii)

Consider the differences in existing local support for hospitals and other local health care providers;

“(viii)

Explore the cost feasibility of a state, county or local hospital district funded catastrophic insurance policy to cover all Wyoming citizens;

“(ix)

Consider state, county, hospital district and other funding sources to address any needs identified by the study; and

“(x)

If state support is identified as a reasonable long term option to address problems identified by the report, determine:

“(A)

The long term financial impact to the state of the program;

“(B)

The formula for distributing the funds;

“(C)

Potential revenue sources to cover the cost of the long term assistance; and

“(D)

The impact of state support on the expansion or growth of trauma care programs because of the state support.

“(b)

The final report of the study shall be submitted to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by October 1, 2004.”

Laws 2004, ch. 103, § 2, appropriates $150,000 from the general fund to the health care commission to carry out the study authorized by the act.

Laws 2004, ch. 103, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

40A Am. Jur. 2d Hospitals and Asylums § 1 et seq.

Theft by servant, tort liability of hospital for, 15 ALR2d 829, 39 ALR4th 543.

Liability of hospital operating ambulance for personal injuries to person being transported, 21 ALR2d 910, 68 ALR4th 14.

Immunity of state or governmental unit or agency from liability for damages in tort in operating hospital, 25 ALR2d 203, 18 ALR4th 858.

Liability of hospital to patient injured through defective wheel chair or similar furniture or appliance, 31 ALR2d 1118.

Liability of incompetent's estate for care and maintenance furnished by public institution or hospital before incompetent's acquisition of any estate or property, 33 ALR2d 1257.

Obstetrical case, hospital's liability for injury or death in, 37 ALR2d 1284, 1 ALR5th 269, 2 ALR5th 811, 3 ALR5th 123, 4 ALR5th 210, 6 ALR5th 534.

X-ray, liability of hospital for injury by, 41 ALR2d 329.

Convalescing patient, hospital's liability for care of, 70 ALR2d 377.

Exterior walks, steps, or grounds, hospital's liability to visitor injured as result of condition of, 71 ALR2d 427.

Hospital's liability to visitor injured by slippery, obstructed or defective interior floors or steps, 71 ALR2d 436.

Emergency ward, hospital's liability as to diagnosis and care of patients brought to, 72 ALR2d 396.

Hospital's liability for injury to patient from heat lamp or pad or hot water bottle, 72 ALR2d 408.

Restrictive covenant, hospital, sanitarium, home for aged, nursing home, or the like, as violation of, 94 ALR2d 726.

Hospital's liability for exposing patient to extraneous infection or contagion, 96 ALR2d 1205.

Hospital's liability for personal injury or death of doctor, nurse, or attendant, 1 ALR3d 1036.

Validity and construction of contract exempting hospital or doctor from liability for negligence to patient, 6 ALR3d 704.

Hospital's liability for negligence in connection with preparation, storage, or dispensing of drug or medicine, 9 ALR3d 579.

Res ipsa loquitur in action against hospital for injury to patient, 9 ALR3d 1315.

Hospital's liability to patient for injury sustained from defective equipment furnished by hospital for use in diagnosis or treatment of patient, 14 ALR3d 1254.

Hospital's liability to patient or prospective patient injured as result of physical condition of premises, 16 ALR3d 1237.

Hospital's liability for injuries sustained by patient as a result of restraints imposed on movement, 25 ALR3d 1450.

Validity and construction of zoning regulations expressly referring to hospitals, sanitariums, nursing homes, 27 ALR3d 1022.

Liability of hospital for negligence of nurse assisting operating surgeon, 29 ALR3d 1065.

Hospital's liability for injury or death to patient resulting from or connected with administration of anesthetic, 31 ALR3d 1114.

Liability of one requesting medical practitioner or hospital to furnish services to third party for cost of services, absent express understanding to pay, 34 ALR3d 176.

Liability of hospital for refusal to admit or treat patient, 35 ALR3d 841.

Attending physician's liability for injury caused by equipment furnished by hospital, 35 ALR3d 1068.

Locality rule as governing hospital's standard of care to patient and expert's competency to testify thereto, 36 ALR3d 440.

Hospital's liability to patient injured going to or using bathroom or toilet facilities, 36 ALR3d 1235.

Exclusion of, or discrimination against, physician or surgeon by hospital, 37 ALR3d 645.

Liability of one releasing institutionalized mental patient for harm he causes, 38 ALR3d 699.

Necessity of expert evidence to support action against hospital for injury to or death of patient, 40 ALR3d 515.

Hospital's liability for injury allegedly caused by improper diet or feeding of patient, 42 ALR3d 736.

Liability for injury allegedly resulting from negligence in making hypodermic injection, 45 ALR3d 731.

Liability of hospital for injury or death from blood transfusion, 45 ALR3d 1364, 20 ALR4th 1287, 24 ALR4th 508.

Liability of hospital for injury caused through assault by a patient, 48 ALR3d 1288.

Hospital's liability to patient for injury allegedly sustained from absence of particular equipment used in diagnosis or treatment of patient, 50 ALR3d 1141.

Hospital's liability for negligence in selection or appointment of staff physician or surgeon, 51 ALR3d 981.

Liability of physician or hospital in the performance of cosmetic surgery upon the face, 54 ALR3d 1255.

Liability of hospital, other than mental institution, for suicide of patient, 60 ALR3d 880.

Validity and construction of contract between hospital and physician providing for exclusive medical services, 74 ALR3d 1268.

Tort liability of physician or hospital in connection with organ or tissue transplant procedures, 76 ALR3d 890.

Recovery for mental or emotional distress resulting from injury to, or death of, member of plaintiff's family arising from physician's or hospital's wrongful conduct, 77 ALR3d 447.

Liability of hospital or similar institution for giving erroneous notification of patient's death, 77 ALR3d 501.

Patient tort liability of rest, convalescent, or nursing homes, 83 ALR3d 871.

Patient's right to refuse treatment allegedly necessary to sustain life, 93 ALR3d 67.

Liability of mental care facility for suicide of patient or former patient, 19 ALR4th 7.

Hospital's liability for patient's injury or death resulting from escape or attempted escape, 37 ALR4th 200.

Criminal liability under statutes penalizing abuse or neglect of the institutionalized infirm, 60 ALR4th 1153.

Liability of hospital, physician or other medical personnel for death or injury from use of drugs to stimulate labor, 1 ALR5th 243.

Liability of hospital, physician or other medical personnel for death or injury to mother or child caused by improper administration of, or failure to administer, anesthesia or tranquilizers, or similar drugs, during labor and delivery, 1 ALR5th 269.

Construction, operation and effect of statute giving hospital lien against recovery from tortfeasor causing patient's injuries, 16 ALR5th 262.

Liability for donee's contraction of Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (AIDS) from blood transfusion, 64 ALR5th 333.

Liability of hospital, or medical practitioner, under doctrine of strict liability in tort, or breach of warranty, for harm caused by drug, medical instrument, or similar device used in treating patient, 65 ALR5th 357.

Validity and construction of Medical Care Recovery Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 2651-2653), dealing with third-party liability for hospital and medical care furnished by United States, 7 ALR Fed 289.

Right to maintain private action under Hill-Burton Act (42 U.S.C. § 291 et seq.) to compel hospital to provide services to persons unable to pay therefor, 11 ALR Fed 683.

Right to relief under federal Civil Rights Act of 1871 (42 U.S.C. § 1983) for alleged wrongful commitment to or confinement in mental hospital, 16 ALR Fed 440.

Closing or relocation of medical facility serving large numbers of minority citizens as violative of Title VI of Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 USC § 2000d et seq.), 69 ALR Fed 588.

41 C.J.S. Hospitals § 1 et seq.